Washington statutes.
RCW 42.26.030

Regulations.

The director of financial management shall adopt such regulations as may be necessary or desirable to implement the provisions of this chapter relating to the establishment of an agency vendor payment revolving fund.

[ 1979 c 151 s 74; 1969 ex.s. c 60 s 3.]